Illinois, session 104th, HB878.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 45-45 and by adding Section 50-95 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/45-45)7    Sec. 45-45. Small businesses. 8    (a) Set-asides. Each chief procurement officer has 9authority to designate as small business set-asides a fair 10proportion of construction, supply, and service contracts for 11award to small businesses in Illinois. Advertisements for bids 12or offers for those contracts shall specify designation as 13small business set-asides and the advertisements shall be 14uniformly distributed to the small business community in this 15State. In awarding the contracts, only bids or offers from 16qualified small businesses shall be considered.17    (b) Small business. "Small business" means a business that 18is independently owned and operated and that is not dominant 19in its field of operation. The chief procurement officer shall 20establish a detailed definition by rule, using in addition to 21the foregoing criteria other criteria, including the number of 22employees and the dollar volume of business. When computing 23the size status of a potential contractor, annual sales and   HB0878 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 04776 SPS 14803 b1receipts of the potential contractor and all of its affiliates 2shall be included. The maximum number of employees and the 3maximum dollar volume that a small business may have under the 4rules promulgated by the chief procurement officer may vary 5from industry to industry to the extent necessary to reflect 6differing characteristics of those industries, subject to the 7following limitations:8        (1) No wholesale business is a small business if its 9    annual sales for its most recently completed fiscal year 10    exceed $13,000,000.11        (2) No retail business or business selling services is 12    a small business if its annual sales and receipts exceed 13    $8,000,000.14        (3) No manufacturing business is a small business if 15    it employs more than 250 persons.16        (4) No construction business is a small business if 17    its annual sales and receipts exceed $14,000,000.18    (c) Fair proportion. For the purpose of subsection (a), 19for State agencies of the executive branch, a fair proportion 20of construction contracts shall be no less than 25% nor more 21than 40% of the annual total contracts for construction.22    (d) Withdrawal of designation. A small business set-aside 23designation may be withdrawn by the purchasing agency when 24deemed in the best interests of the State. Upon withdrawal, 25all bids or offers shall be rejected, and the bidders or 26offerors shall be notified of the reason for rejection. The   HB0878 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 04776 SPS 14803 b1contract shall then be awarded in accordance with this Code 2without the designation of small business set-aside. Each 3chief procurement officer shall make the annual report 4available on his or her official website. Each chief 5procurement officer shall also issue a press release in 6conjunction with the small business annual report that 7includes an executive summary of the annual report and a link 8to the annual report on the chief procurement officer's 9website.10    (e) Small business specialist. Each chief procurement 11officer shall designate one or more individuals to serve as 12its small business specialist. The small business specialists 13shall collectively work together to accomplish the following 14duties:15        (1) Compiling and maintaining a comprehensive list of 16    potential small contractors. In this duty, he or she shall 17    cooperate with the Federal Small Business Administration 18    in locating potential sources for various products and 19    services.20        (2) Assisting small businesses in complying with the 21    procedures for bidding on State contracts.22        (3) Examining requests from State agencies for the 23    purchase of property or services to help determine which 24    invitations to bid are to be designated small business 25    set-asides.26        (4) Making recommendations to the chief procurement   HB0878 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 04776 SPS 14803 b1    officer for the simplification of specifications and terms 2    in order to increase the opportunities for small business 3    participation.4        (5) Assisting in investigations by purchasing agencies 5    to determine the responsibility of bidders or offerors on 6    small business set-asides.7    (f) Small business annual report. Each small business 8specialist designated under subsection (e) shall annually 9before November 1 report in writing to the General Assembly 10concerning the awarding of contracts to small businesses. The 11report shall include the total value of awards made in the 12preceding fiscal year under the designation of small business 13set-aside. The report shall also include the total value of 14awards made to businesses owned by minorities, women, and 15persons with disabilities, as defined in the Business 16Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 17Disabilities Act, in the preceding fiscal year under the 18designation of small business set-aside.19    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 20shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 21by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act.22(Source: P.A. 103-570, eff. 1-1-24.) 23    (30 ILCS 500/50-95 new)24    Sec. 50-95. Small business scorecard. Each chief 25procurement officer shall, in consultation with State   HB0878 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 04776 SPS 14803 b1agencies, develop a scorecard for businesses that have annual 2gross sales of less than $15,000,000 as evidenced by the 3federal income tax return of the business. The scorecard shall 4include the relevant experience of the business, the location 5of the business, the length of time the business has been 6operating in this State, staff credentials, innovation, and 7other socioeconomic factors.